Hawaii statutes.
[§432D-24] Coordination of benefits.
(a) Health maintenance organizations are permitted, but not required to adopt
provisions for coordination of benefits to avoid overinsurance and to provide
for the orderly payment of claims when a person is covered by two or more group
health insurance or health care plans.

(b) If health maintenance organizations adopt
provisions for coordination of benefits, the provisions must be consistent with
the coordination of benefits provisions that are in general use in the State
for coordinating coverage between two or more group health insurance or health
care plans. [L 1995, c 179, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next